Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2125YC (4) 91 nls/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 514C.3D Prior authorization for 1 dental care services. 2 1. Definitions. As used in this section unless the context 3 otherwise provides: 4 a. âCommissionerâ means the commissioner of insurance. 5 b. âCovered personâ means the same as defined in section 6 514C.3C. 7 c. âDental care providerâ means the same as defined in 8 section 514C.3C. 9 d. âDental care service planâ means the same as defined in 10 section 514C.3C. 11 e. âDental care servicesâ means the same as defined in 12 section 514C.3C. 13 f. âDental carrierâ means the same as defined in section 14 514C.3C. 15 g. âPrior authorizationâ means a determination by a dental 16 carrier in response to a request submitted by a dental care 17 provider as to whether a specific dental care service proposed 18 by the dental care provider for a covered person will be 19 reimbursed at a specified amount, subject to any applicable 20 coinsurance or deductible required under the covered personâs 21 dental care service plan. 22 2. Prior authorization. 23 a. A dental carrier shall not deny a claim submitted by a 24 dental care provider for dental care services approved by prior 25 authorization. 26 b. A dental carrier shall reimburse a dental care provider 27 at the contracted reimbursement rate for a dental care service 28 provided by the dental care provider to a covered person per 29 a prior authorization. 30 3. Exceptions. Subsection 2 shall not apply if any of the 31 following apply for each dental care service for which a dental 32 care provider is denied reimbursement: 33 a. On the date that the dental care service was provided 34 by the dental care provider to the covered person per a 35 -1- LSB 2125YC (4) 91 nls/ko 1/ 4 H.F. _____ prior authorization, a benefit limitation including but not 1 limited to an annual maximum or a frequency limitation that 2 was not applicable at the time of the prior authorization had 3 been reached due to utilization of the dental care service 4 plan subsequent to the dental carrier issuing the prior 5 authorization. 6 b. The dental care provider submits a claim for dental care 7 services approved by prior authorization and the documentation 8 of dental care services fails to support the claim for 9 dental care services as originally authorized by the prior 10 authorization. 11 c. Subsequent to the issuance of a prior authorization, and 12 prior to the provision of dental care services authorized by 13 the prior authorization, a covered person receives additional 14 dental care services, or a change in the dental condition of 15 the covered person occurs, such that the dental care services 16 authorized by the prior authorization are no longer considered 17 medically necessary based on the prevailing standard of care. 18 d. Subsequent to the issuance of a prior authorization, and 19 prior to the provision of dental care services authorized by 20 the prior authorization, a covered person receives additional 21 dental care services, or a change in the dental condition 22 of the covered person occurs, such that on the date that 23 the dental care service is to be provided a request for 24 prior authorization of the dental care service would require 25 disapproval pursuant to the terms and conditions for coverage 26 under the covered personâs current dental care service plan. 27 e. A payor other than the dental carrier is responsible for 28 payment for the dental care service. 29 f. A dental care provider has already received payment from 30 the dental carrier for the dental care services identified in 31 the claim for reimbursement. 32 g. The claim was submitted fraudulently to the dental 33 carrier. 34 h. The dental care provider, covered person, or other 35 -2- LSB 2125YC (4) 91 nls/ko 2/ 4 H.F. _____ person not related to the dental carrier provided inaccurate 1 information that the dental carrier relied on, in whole 2 or in part, for the dental carrierâs prior authorization 3 determination. 4 i. On the date that the dental care service was provided by 5 the dental care provider to the covered person per the prior 6 authorization, the covered person was ineligible to receive the 7 dental care service and the dental carrier did not know, and 8 with the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of 9 the covered personâs ineligibility. 10 4. Waiver prohibited. The requirements of this section 11 shall not be waived by contract. Any contract contrary to this 12 section shall be null and void. 13 5. Rules. The commissioner may adopt rules pursuant to 14 chapter 17A to administer this section. 15